Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-15,305
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the Nebraska Environmental Response Act.

Laws 2022, LB1102, § 5.
July 21, 2022